Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5555.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-25-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-25 entitled "Veterinary
Practice" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-25-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Animal” means any animal other than humans and includes, by way of illustration,
not limitation, fowl, birds, fish, livestock, and reptiles, wild or domestic, living or dead.
(2) “Department” means the Rhode Island department of health.
(3) “Director” means the director of the Rhode Island department of health.
(4) “Division” means the division of professional regulation within the department of
health established in chapter 26 of this title.
(5) “Veterinarian” means a person who practices is licensed to practice veterinary medicine
in the State of Rhode Island.
(6) “Veterinarian/client/patient relationship” means a relationship where all of the
following conditions have been met:
(i) The veterinarian has assumed the responsibility for making medical judgments
regarding the health of the animal or animals and the need for medical treatment, and the client has
agreed to follow the instructions of the veterinarian;
(ii) The veterinarian has sufficient knowledge of the animal or animals to initiate at least a
general or preliminary (e.g. tentative) diagnosis of the medical condition of the animal or animals.

This means that the veterinarian has recently seen and is personally acquainted with the keeping
and care of the animal or animals, and/or by medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises
where the animal or animals are kept, or obtained current knowledge of the animal through a video-
based telecommunication medium, subject to the limitations and requirements of § 5-25-18;
(iii) The veterinarian is readily available for follow-up in cases of adverse reactions or
failure of the regimen of therapy; and
(iv) The veterinarian maintains records that document patient visits, diagnosis, treatment,
and other relevant information.
(7) “Veterinary dentistry” means that part of veterinary science that deals with the
prevention and treatment of diseases, developmental conditions, and injuries of the teeth, gums,
and oral cavity in animals.
SECTION 2. Chapter 5-25 of the General Laws entitled "Veterinary Practice" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
5-25-18. Veterinary telemedicine client-patient relationship.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, regulation or rule to the contrary, a
veterinarian may establish a client-patient relationship in Rhode Island through synchronous,
audiovisual electronic means, subject to the limitations and requirements set forth in subsection (b)
of this section.
(b) Before establishing a veterinarian client-patient relationship through electronic means,
a veterinarian shall:
(1) Be licensed to practice veterinary medicine pursuant to this chapter;
(2) Obtain from the client verbal consent to establish the veterinarian client-patient
relationship through electronic means, including an acknowledgement that the same standards of
care under state law and regulations apply to telehealth and in-person visits; and
(3) Maintain such documentation for at least one year.
(c) A veterinarian shall practice in a manner consistent with the prevailing professional
standard of practice for a veterinarian who provides in-person veterinary services to patients in this
state and shall employ sound professional judgment to determine whether using veterinary
telehealth is an appropriate method for delivering medical advice or treatment to the patient.
(d) Veterinarians may prescribe after establishing a virtual veterinary client-patient
relationship under the following conditions·
(1) Prescriptions based on a virtual veterinary client-patient relationship shall be issued
initially for no more than thirty (30) days and shall not be renewed for more than thirty (30) days
without an additional virtual or in-person examination.
LC001865/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

(2) A prescription renewed once and based upon only virtual examinations shall not be
renewed again without an in-person examination.
(3) A veterinarian may not prescribe a controlled substance as defined in § 5-19.1-2 unless
the veterinarian has conducted an in-person examination of the animal or made medically
appropriate and timely visits to the premises where the animal or group of animals is kept.
(e) Services provided through veterinary telemedicine are subject to this state's laws and
regulations governing the veterinary provider's scope of practice.
(f) Each telemedicine provider shall disclose to consumers a description of services and
standard charges in a consumer-friendly display that is easily accessible on the provider's website.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001865/SUB A
========
LC001865/SUB A - Page 3 of 4